Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,211
Snowmobiles; certificate of registration and validation decal; expiration; renewal; procedure.

(1) The certificate of registration and validation decal issued shall be valid for two years. The registration period for snowmobiles shall expire on the last day of September two years after the year of issuance, and renewal shall become delinquent on the first day of the following month.

(2) Such registration may be renewed every two years in the same manner as provided for the original registration.

(3) Every owner of a snowmobile shall renew his or her registration in the manner prescribed in section 60-3,209 upon payment of the registration fees provided in section 60-3,210.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 211.